Washington statutes.
RCW 36.160.040

Cultural access program—Start-up funding and conditional formation.

(1) The county creating a program may advance to the program funding for its administrative costs, including the cost of informing the public about the formation of the program, how it is proposed to be funded, and the public benefits to be realized if it is successful. However, this subsection does not authorize the preparation and distribution of information to the general public for the purpose of influencing the outcome of any election called for voter authorization of a proposed tax to support a program.

(2) The county creating a program may provide for repayment of any start-up funding advanced to a program from the proceeds of taxes authorized under RCW 36.160.080, 82.14.525, and 84.52.821 and approved by voters after the taxes are first collected. The funds may be repaid to such county with interest at the internal rate of return on the invested funds of such county.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 24 s 302.]

NOTES:

Construction—2015 3rd sp.s. c 24: See note following RCW 36.160.030.